Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-2,164.01
Agricultural products; Department of Agriculture; cooperate with federal government; information and statistics; publication.

The Department of Agriculture is hereby authorized to cooperate with the federal government and other farm industry groups or associations in assembling and disseminating current and timely information, regarding prices and market conditions relating to agricultural products produced, throughout the State of Nebraska. The department may disseminate, without expense, through the newspapers, through radio and television media, or by telephone facilities designed for such purpose, timely reports of such information as will be of general value and benefit to the producers and dealers in agricultural products to promote and assist the agriculture industry.

Laws 1953, c. 337, § 1, p. 1110;

Laws 1974, LB 888, § 1;

Laws 1986, LB 795, § 2.